es: Estilo de borde de bloque: Bordes biselados; Mixto; Bordes redondeados; Bordes cuadrados; Otro
en: Block edge style: Chamfered edges; Mixed; Rounded edges; Square edges; Other
el: Στυλ ακμής μπλοκ: Λοξοτμημένες άκρες; Μικτές; Στρογγυλεμένες άκρες; Τετραγωνισμένες άκρες; Άλλο
fi: Lohkon reunan tyyli: Viistetyt reunat; Yhdistelmä; Pyöristetyt reunat; Suorakulmaiset reunat; Muu
zh-CN: 块状边缘样式: 倒角边缘; 混合边缘; 圆角边缘; 方角边缘; 其他
ko: 블록 엣지 스타일: 챔퍼 모서리; 혼합형; 둥근 모서리; 사각 모서리; 기타
pt-PT: Estilo de borda em bloco: Bordos chanfrados; Mistos; Bordos arredondados; Bordos quadrados; Outros
lt-LT: Bloko krašto tipas: Nusklembti kraštai; Mišrūs; Užapvalinti kraštai; Statūs kraštai; Kita
tr: Blok kenar stili: Eğimli kenarlar; Karma; Yuvarlatılmış kenarlar; Kare kenarlar; Diğer
sv: Blockkantstil: Fasade kanter; Blandade; Rundade kanter; Raka kanter; Övrigt
hr-HR: Stil ruba bloka: Zakošeni rubovi; Mješovito; Zaobljeni rubovi; Ravni rubovi; Ostalo
sl-SI: Slog roba bloka: Posneti robovi; Mešani; Zaobljeni robovi; Ravni robovi; Drugo
pt-BR: Estilo de borda em bloco: Bordas chanfradas; Misto; Bordas arredondadas; Bordas quadradas; Outro
zh-TW: 積木邊緣樣式: 倒角邊緣; 混合; 圓角邊緣; 方角邊緣; 其他
nb: Blokkkantstil: Fasede kanter; Blandet; Avrundede kanter; Rette kanter; Annet
vi: Kiểu cạnh khối: Cạnh vát; Hỗn hợp; Cạnh bo tròn; Cạnh vuông; Khác
th: รูปแบบขอบบล็อก: ขอบลบมุม; ผสม; ขอบมน; ขอบเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
ja: ブロックエッジスタイル: 面取りエッジ; ミックス; ラウンドエッジ; スクエアエッジ; その他
fr: Style des bords du bloc: Bords chanfreinés; Mixtes; Bords arrondis; Bords carrés; Autre
ro-RO: Stilul marginii blocului: Margini teșite; Mixt; Margini rotunjite; Margini drepte; Altele
sk-SK: Štýl blokového okraja: Skosené hrany; Zmiešané; Zaoblené hrany; Pravouhlé hrany; Iné
hu: Fakocka éleinek kialakítása: Letört élek; Vegyes; Lekerekített élek; Szögletes élek; Egyéb
nl: Blokrand stijl: Afgeschuinde randen; Gemengd; Afgeronde randen; Rechte randen; Anders
ru: Тип обработки краев блоков: Со скошенными краями; Смешанный; С закругленными краями; С прямыми углами; Другое
de: Stil der Blockkante: Gefaste Kanten; Gemischt; Abgerundete Kanten; Gerade Kanten; Sonstige
pl: Styl krawędzi klocka: Fazowane krawędzie; Mieszane; Zaokrąglone krawędzie; Proste krawędzie; Inny
bg-BG: Стил на блоковия ръб: Скосени ръбове; Смесени; Заоблени ръбове; Квадратни ръбове; Други
it: Stile a bordo squadrato: Bordi smussati; Misti; Bordi arrotondati; Bordi squadrati; Altro
cs: Styl hran bloku: Zkosené hrany; Smíšené; Zaoblené hrany; Hranaté hrany; Jiné
da: Blokkantstil: Affasede kanter; Blandet; Afrundede kanter; Firkantede kanter; Andet